North Carolina, session 2025, SB262.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly rescinds all extant applications by the General
Assembly to the Congress of the United States ratified prior to December 1, 2024, to call for a
convention to propose amendments to the Constitution of the United States, pursuant to the terms
of Article V of the Constitution of the United States thereof, regardless of whether the
applications were for a limited convention to propose one or more amendments regarding one or
more specific subjects and purposes or for a general convention to propose an unlimited number
of amendments upon an unlimited number of subjects.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S262-v-1*